District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, that this act may
be cited as the “Small Retailer Property Tax Credit Expansion Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 18 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 47-1807.14(a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (5) is amended to read as follows:
“(5) “Maximum credit amount” means:
“(A) For tax years beginning after December 31, 2017, and before January
1, 2024, $5,000;
“(B) For the tax year ending December 31, 2024, $10,000;
“(C) For tax year ending December 31, 2025, $10,000, increased annually

pursuant to the cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple of $100,
rounded down to the next multiple of $100);
“(D) For the tax year ending December 31, 2026, $20,000;
“(E) For tax years beginning after December 31, 2026, $20,000, increased
annually pursuant to the cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple
of $100, rounded down to the next multiple of $100).”.
(b) Section 47-1808.14(a)(5) is amended to read as follows:
“(5) “Maximum credit amount” means:
“(A) For tax years beginning after December 31, 2017, and before January
1, 2024, $5,000;
“(B) For the tax year ending December 31, 2024, $10,000;
“(C) For tax year ending December 31, 2025, $10,000, increased annually
pursuant to the cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple of $100,
rounded down to the next multiple of $100);
“(D) For the tax year ending December 31, 2026, $20,000;
“(E) For tax years beginning after December 31, 2026, $20,000, increased
annually pursuant to the cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple
of $100, rounded down to the next multiple of $100).”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.


This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.